Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2640
Commercial and noncommercial applicator licenses; examination required.

Each person applying for a license as a commercial or noncommercial applicator shall meet the certification requirement of passing an examination demonstrating that the person:

(1) Is properly qualified to perform functions associated with pesticide use to a degree directly related to the nature of the activity and the associated responsibility; and

(2) Has knowledge of the use and effects of restricted-use pesticides in the categories in which the person is to be licensed.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 12.